Indiana, session 2026, SB74.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 8-1-40-3, AS ADDED BY P.L.264-2017,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) As used in this chapter, "distributed
generation" means electricity produced by a generator or other device
that is:
(1) located on the customer's premises;
(2) owned by the customer;
(3) sized at a nameplate capacity of the lesser of:
(A) not more than one (1) megawatt; or
(B) the customer's average annual consumption of electricity
on the premises; and
(4) interconnected and operated in parallel with the electricity
supplier's facilities in accordance with the commission's approved
interconnection standards.
(b) The term does not include electricity produced by the following:
(1) An electric generator used exclusively for emergency
purposes.
2026 IN 74—LS 6230/DI 119


(2) A net metering facility (as defined in 170 IAC 4-4.2-1(k))
operating under a net metering tariff.
(3) A plug-in home solar unit (as defined in IC 8-1-46.5-1)
described in IC 8-1-46.5-2(a).
SECTION 2. IC 8-1-46.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 46.5. Plug-In Home Solar Units
Sec. 1. (a) The definitions in IC 8-1-40 apply throughout this
chapter.
(b) As used in this chapter, "plug-in home solar unit" means a
photovoltaic electricity generation device that:
(1) has a maximum power output of not more than one
thousand two hundred (1,200) watts; and
(2) is designed to be connected to a building's electrical system
through a standard one hundred twenty (120) volt alternating
current outlet.
Sec. 2. (a) This section applies to a plug-in home solar unit that:
(1) is certified by Underwriters Laboratories or an equivalent,
nationally recognized testing laboratory; and
(2) meets the standards of the National Electrical Code.
(b) An electricity supplier may not require a customer to:
(1) obtain the electricity supplier's approval before installing
or using;
(2) pay any fee or charge related to the customer's use of;
(3) make modifications to; or
(4) install additional equipment as a result of a customer's
installation or use of;
a plug-in home solar unit described in subsection (a) that is
connected to the electrical system of the customer's residence.
Sec. 3. A plug-in home solar unit must incorporate functionality
that:
(1) is activated by a loss of electrical power to; and
(2) when activated, disconnects the plug-in home solar unit
from;
the electrical system of the building to which the plug-in home
solar unit is connected.
Sec. 4. An electricity supplier is not liable for any injury or
damages caused to a customer by a plug-in home solar unit.
SECTION 3. IC 34-30-2.1-77.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 77.7. IC 8-1-46.5-4 (Concerning
2026 IN 74—LS 6230/DI 119


plug-in home solar units).
2026 IN 74—LS 6230/DI 119